North Carolina, session 2025, HB486.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Blue Star Families, Inc., a nonprofit
organization, to be used as follows:
(1) Four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to help launch the Greater
Fayetteville Regional Chapter for Military Spouses Career Development
Programs.
(2) Three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for Family Strengthening
Programs.
(3) Three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for Military and Veteran
Caregiver Services.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H486-v-1*